Hawaii statutes.
[§425E-604] Person's power to
dissociate as a general partner; wrongful dissociation. (a) A
person has the power to dissociate as a general partner at any time, rightfully
or wrongfully, by express will pursuant to section 425E-603(1).

(b) A person's dissociation as a general
partner is wrongful only if:

(1) It is in breach of an express provision of the
partnership agreement; or

(2) It occurs before the termination of the limited
partnership, and:

(A) The person withdraws as a general partner
by express will;

(B) The person is expelled as a general
partner by judicial determination under section 425E-603(5);

(C) The person is dissociated as a general
partner by becoming a debtor in bankruptcy; or

(D) In the case of a person that is not an individual,
trust other than a business trust, or estate, the person is expelled or
otherwise dissociated as a general partner because it wilfully dissolved or
terminated.

(c) A person that wrongfully dissociates as a
general partner shall be liable to the limited partnership and, subject to
section 425E-1001, to the other partners for damages caused by the
dissociation. The liability shall be in addition to any other obligation of
the general partner to the limited partnership or to the other partners. [L
2003, c 210, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next